2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-ga.pat.txt
.ab4ai
.ab6ar
.ab5r
.ac6ad
.ach6ar
.ad6aim
.ad6am
.ae5n
.ag6ar
.agh4a
.ag4??
.ag5r
.ag6??i
.ai6c5
.ail6te
.ain3g4
.ain6te.
.ain6t5??n
.air6n??
.ais3
.aist4
.ais6te.
.a??4
.ala5m6
.al5g6
.allag6
.alm4??
.al2t5a
.al6t5??
.am6ac
.am6??
.an2a
.ana5c
.anach6
.an2??
.anc6
.an6d??r
.an6dr
.an6fa
.ang4l
.an6i
.an6lain
.an6lan
.an6??
.an6rai
.an6sa
.an2ta
.ar2
.aral4
.aralt3
.ara5m6
.ara5s6
.ard5
.ar??5
.ar??c6
.art4
.as6ail
.as6aim5
.as6al.
.as6am
.asa5m6a
.asc6ar
.as6??
.as6pa.
.as2t
.ast5ai
.ast5a??
.ast3??
.as6t??
.as4??
.ata6
.at5ar.
.at6??
.??il6te.
.??il6t5ea
.??ir5ge
.??ir5g??
.??ir6s
.??l6t
.??r2a
.??r6m
.ba6d
.bad3??
.bal6b
.beo5f
.beo5g
.beo5id
.beo5im
.bh4
.bh??5ite.
.bh??5it??
.bheo5f
.bheo5id
.bheo5im
.bheo5in
.bh??5d??s
.bh??5mis
.bh??5oda
.bh??5omar
.bh??5te??
.bh??5t??
.bhl??3
.bhreo5f
.bhreo5id
.bhreo5im
.bhreo5in
.bhr??3o
.bl??3
.breo5f
.breo5id
.breo5im
.br??3o
.ca4
.cach5
.cacht6
.cad5??
.ca??5d
.ca??5g??
.ca??5m
.ca??5o
.car6t5ar
.ch4
.cha4
.chach5
.chad5??
.cha??5d
.cha??5g??
.cha??5m
.cha??5o
.cha??5te??
.cha??5t??
.chan5??
.char6t5ar
.char6t??
.ch??r5ta.
.cheil6te.
.ch??6
.chl??5f
.chl??5id
.chl??5im
.chl??5inn
.chna??3
.chn??5
.ch??is5
.ci6
.cil6
.c??6
.cli6
.clip5
.cl??5f
.cl??5id
.cl??5im
.cna??3
.cn??5
.da6
.dh2
.dhl??5d
.dhl??5g
.dhl??5m
.dhl??3o
.dh??5ite.
.dh??5it??
.dhreach5
.dhreacht6
.dhreo5f
.dhreo5id
.dhreo5im
.dhreo5in
.dl??5d
.dl??5g
.dl??5m
.dl??5o
.d??5f
.d??5id??
.d??5im
.d??5ite.
.d??5it??
.dreach5
.dreo5f
.dreo5id
.dreo5im
.ead1
.ea6g3
.eal4t3
.earb5
.eas3t??
.ei6
.eisc3e
.eis4il
.??a6b
.??ad6ar
.??a3g6??
.??ar5
.??art6
.??i5d6r
.??i5gear
.??im5??
.fa6
.fach3
.feo5f
.feo5id??
.feo5im
.fhrioch5
.fhua6fair
.fhua6fara
.fhua5im.
.f??5d??
.f??5g
.f??5m
.f??5odh
.f??5onn
.geal6t5a??
.geat5
.gh2
.ghair5t
.ghlae3
.ghr??6n
.g??f5
.ha4
.hab6ai
.hab6ar
.hac6ad
.hag6ar
.hag4??
.hail6te
.hain3g
.hain3t
.hain6te.
.hair6n??
.hais5ce
.hais5tea
.hais5t6eo
.haist6i
.hais5tig
.ha??4
.hala5m6
.halm4??
.hal4t3a
.hal6t5??
.han2a
.hana5c
.hanc6
.han6fa
.hang4l
.han6??
.han4ta
.har2a
.har6??
.har6??5
.har??c6
.hart6
.has6ai
.has6al.
.has6am
.has4ta
.hat6??
.h??6
.h??il6te.
.h??il6t5ea
.h??ir5ge
.h??ir5g??
.h??ir6s
.h??l6t
.h??r4a
.h??r6m
.head3
.heal4t3
.heis6il
.h??ad6ar
.h??a3g6??
.h??id4e
.h??i5dea
.hib6??
.him6ire
.hios5
.hiosc6
.hir4
.his4
.hist3
.hit6eo
.hit6r
.h??2
.h??l3
.h??och5
.h??ocht6
.hoc4r
.hod6
.hogh6
.hoir6n5i
.hol6ac
.hom2
.hor5m
.hort4
.h??6
.hua4f
.huaf5a
.huil4e
.h??d4
.ia5it
.iat6
.ib6??
.ibh5
.id2
.il3
.im6ire
.in6d5ia
.in6id
.in6??n
.in4??o
.in6??r
.in6ste.
.int6e
.iom??in5
.ios3
.iosc6
.iost4
.ir4
.is4
.ist6
.it6
.??l3
.??o6
.??och5
.??ocht6
.??os5
.la4
.lach6t5
.lad5a
.lag5??
.lait5
.lan5c
.lao5n
.l??5it??
.leab3??
.lea6m
.leas5
.leat6a??
.leo3c
.leoch4
.l??5ann.
.l??5ig??
.li6
.lib5??
.lim5
.lint6
.lip5
.l??5d
.l??5g
.l??5mi
.l??5od
.l??5omar
.l??5onn
.l??6t
.l??t5i
.l??2
.mad5a
.mair5t??.
.ma??5d
.ma??5g??
.ma??5mi
.ma??5od
.ma??5oma
.ma??5on
.ma??5te??
.ma??5t??
.mam5
.man2t
.ma6r
.mar6l5
.mar6s5ac
.mar6s5ai
.mar5ta
.mar5??
.ma6t
.mat3??
.mead5a
.meat5??
.mh2
.mhad5a
.mhais6te.
.mhais6t??.
.mha??5d
.mha??5g??
.mha??5mi
.mha??5od
.mha??5oma
.mha??5on
.mha??5te.
.mha??5te??
.mha??5t??
.mhan4t3
.mhar6l5
.mhar6sa.
.mhion6t5a
.mh??6oc
.mh??6
.mh??ch5
.m??6oc
.m??5st
.nair5
.nais5
.na??3
.na??o5l6
.nar5
.nd6
.nd??5f
.nd??5id??
.nd??5im
.nd??5in
.neach6
.neacht5
.ne??6
.ne??d5
.ng4
.ng??f5
.nit6
.n??5d
.n??5g??
.n??5m
.n??6oc
.n??5od
.n??5om
.n??5on
.nom6
.och6t5
.oc4r
.od6
.ogh6
.oilt6
.oir4n3e
.oir6n5i
.oir6n??
.oir5t
.ol6ac
.om6a
.or6ai
.ort4
.or6thu
.os6l??.
.ost5a
.??p6
.??r4??
.phor5t6r
.pist6
.ra4
.rad5a
.rad5??
.raf6t5
.rai6
.rat5??
.r??6
.reas5
.reo5f
.reo5id
.reo5im
.reo5in
.r??im5i
.r??5d??
.r??5g??
.r??5mi
.r??6ocha
.r??5od
.r??5oma
.r??5onn
.r??b5a
.r??5c
.r??ch6
.r??st5
.rua5im.
.r??m5
.sa6l
.sal5a
.s??5it??
.sc6
.sca6
.scad5??
.scar5
.scart6
.searbh5
.s??a5l6ain
.sh??5inn.
.si4
.sim3
.si??n4
.si??nt3
.s??4o
.slios5
.sm4
.sn??5d
.sn??5g
.sn??5m
.sn??5od
.sn??5oma
.sn??5on
.s??5f
.s??5id??
.s??5im
.s??5inn
.spl??ach5
.st4
.steam5
.ta6
.tach6t5
.tan5g
.tap5
.tar5ta
.t??it5e
.th2
.th??it5ea
.thr??5it??
.thr??f5
.ti6
.tr??f5
.ts??6o
.tua5im
.ua4f
.uaf5a
.ua6i
.uas6ala
.uil2e
.uir6t
.uirthi5
.un6s5
.ur5b
.ur3n4
.??d2
.??m5
.??r6??i
ab1a
abac6
aba5ca
aba5d??
ab4airt
a3b4al
ab4art
ab1??
ab3d
abh1
abh6aile
a3bh6e
abh6??r
abh6re
abh2t
a5bi
ab1l
a5b??.
ab3??ig
a5b??n
a1br
ab3rad6
abra3da
a5bu
ab1??
ac1a
ac4ad??
acae6
ac4aoi
ac6ard
aca1s4
ac4ast??
aca3t4??
a3c??id
ac??r5
ac5??
ach1a
a4cha.
acha6d5??
achar5
ach4arf
acharn6
achart6
ach1??
6ach??r
6a3che
ach3??
4ach1l
a6chli
ach3??g
ach5??r
ach1r
6achri
ach1??
ac1l
3acm
ac1n
ac1??
ac1ra
acra3f
ac4ras
ac3r??
a5cr??
ac5ua
ac5??
adag6
ad1al
ad1am
4adamh
ada5n6??
ad3ara
ad3arl
ad5art
ad5??il
ad5??s
4adc
adh1
adhb1
a3dhi
4adhro
a5dh??
ad3i
4ad3l
4a3d4o
a1d??
a4d3??d
a2d??f
a2d3??id
a4d3??ig
a2d3??im
a4d3??inn
ad1r
ad3rog
ad3u
ad1??
a3d4??r
ae3a
ae1??
aeil3
aeilg4
aeil??5te
af1
afa3d??
af5air
af5art
af??il3
af??ilt6
afhol6
afholt5
a3f6l
a3fo
a3f??ib
a3f??in
a1f2??n
af6r??
af6??
agad3??
agair5n6
ag2al
ag5??is
ag3e
ag3??
agh1
agh4aid
agh5an
a5ghi
ag3i
ag1l
a3go
a3graim
a3gram
a6g5re
ag3ri
ag5rui
ag3r??
ag3ua
ag3??
a1h
ah6a
aich6t
ai5ci??
aic5r
6aidear
4aidhl
aid1i
aid??t5
ai3fil
ai3gin
6aigis
ail5bh??
ailc3ea
ailp3i
ailp3??n
ailt2
a6imh
4ai3mia
aim3ise
ain5??
ains5eo
ain6tean
ain5t??
air6bh3r
airb4??
air4b5r
air4d??
airf5ean
air6f5in.
airf3??
air4f??n
4airisc
airis6t
air5n??n
air5n??o
air4t5??is
6aisei
aisi3n4??
ai5s6??l
4aisp
ais5teog
ais6ti5s
ais5t6??n.
4aitei
ai5t6il
aits3e
4aivi
a??2c
4a??n??
a??3o3d??
a??o5l6an
a??3onna
a??5??i
al1a
ala3b
alabh4
al4ainne
alait4
al3a??
alan4a
alan5d
al2ann
alas3
alasc6
4al4ath
al1??
a3l??ib
6al??m
a3l??r
al1c??
6al5e
al4f3air
al3g??
al3i
a3l??
a6ll
al5o
al1??
2alr
a6lt
alt3e
al6t5??d
al4t??f
al6t5??id
al6t5??im
al6t5??in
al6t??
al3ui
al3??
al??3ch4
ama3b
ama3d4??
am1al
am5all
am1an
am3ara
ama3ra??
a6mas
ama5s??
4am??l
am4??na
4amb
amh1
amh5ad
amhais6t
a3mhas
a1mo
am5??na
6amp
amp1a
amp1??
am4pr
4amt
am5ut
am3??i
am5??r
anac4
ana3ca
an6ag
6anaige
anaist4
an3ait
an5a??
ana5l6??
ana5m6??
ana5r6a
anat6
an1??
an5??is
a5n6??ise
an5??r
6anb
anc1a
anc4aire
an5c??5
an2d3??
and??6
and??b5
and3o
an3dr
6andu
an3e
an6ea
an3??
ang1
ang3a
anga3r??
ang3??
an5g??.
anin5
an4ma
ann5
6ann??
an3oi
an5o??
an1??
an??d4
an??3d??
an4san
an6sin
an6tu
an3u
anuas6
an1??
aoch3
aocht6
6aod
ao5dar
ao5id??s
ao5im.
ao3imi
aoin6s
aoin3t2
ao4l1
ao5mar
aon3u
ao6r1
aorg4
aort4
aos3t
ap1
apa5d??
a3p4ait
aplais6
ar1a
ara3b??
ar6ac.
ara3c6??
arach6t5
ara5c??
ara3g4a
araic6??
ara5l4??
ara3p4
ar5as.
ara5s??
ara3t??
ar1??
arbh3a
ar3bhe
arch6
arc1??
ar1cr
ar1e
ar2f1??
ar3i
arm4??
a5ro
ar1??
ar??c6ar
ar5??n
ar5??p
ar1p
ar4p3??
ar4s3??l
ar6sta
ar3u
ar3??il
ar5??l
ar3??p
ar5??5s6
a5r??t
asa5c6a
a3s4ae
asain4
as5a??
as6alait
asal2t
asa5mait
as6arb
asc1
ascar5
as5cara
ascart6
as3co
4ascr
4as3e
as3??
as3i
as3??
2asl
as1o
as1??
as6??il
a3s4??l
as1ta
as6t5ais
ast4a??.
ast3al
asta5r6??
as6tas
as3t??n.
as5t??
as3ti
as5to
a4st??
as5t??r
as5tua
as3t??
as1u
as1??
as??d6
as??3it
as??5m
at1a
atac6
ata5c??
atad5??n
at4agr
a5t6aint
at5a1l2
ata3m
atam4??
a3t4ant
ata3p4
at5arn
at3as
at??6i
a5t??r
at??5t
at??th6
at??3
at??ad6
ath1
athr??5d
athr??5g??
athr??5m
athr??5o
ath6us
at5??d
a6t??g
at3??id
at3??ig
at3??im
at5rap
at1r??
a6tro
ats5a
at6sar
at1u
at4ui
at1??
a5v??
??b3a
??b4al
??b1??
??bh1
??bht6
??b1l
??5bo
??b3??
??b3??
??c1a
??car5
??carn6
??ch5??
??ch5e
??ch5i
??ch3l
??ch5r
??ch4t3
??c3l
??c3r
??c3??
??d1
??3d4ar
??dh3a
??dh5??
??1fa
??4fa.
??6f3ac
??f5air
??f5ara
??3f??
??f3l
??f1r
??ga5d??
??3g??
??g3r
??g5u
??5h??
??ib5??
??id1
??3id??s
??3ig??
??il5b
??il3c6
??ilt6e??
??ilt3i
??i6m
??3im.
??im5??
??6imh
??1imi
??6im5ise
6??inia
??ins4
??in3te
??in4teo
6??ip
4??ir4g3
??irt3
??isc1
??ist3e
??ist3i
??is5t6??n??
??3itear
??it3??
??it3s
??5??re
??l1
??lc6
??l4s3
??m3an
??3mar
??m3at
??mh1
??n1
??n6ga
??3nna
??nt4
??p1
??r1
??rach3
??r5aim
??r5am
??r6ca
??5r6??
4??rn2
??3rol
??r4ta
??rt6ai
??rt6an
??rt6r
??s3a
??sc3
??s5c6??
??s5e
??s3??
??s1??
??s1t4a
??s3t??
??s3u
??s3??
??t3a
??t1??
??th1
??3th4e
??t1??
??t3r
??5??l
ba5cas
4bac??
bac6s5
b5adar
ba3d??i
b3aid??
b3aig
b3aim
bain5t4
baisc5e
baist3
bait3??
b6ait??
b1a??
balbh5??
bamb6
banais3
ban3d4
bar3b
bar1n2
b4arr
bar3??
ba5s6??ir
ba5s6??r
bas5c6ar6
bascarn5
bat5a
b??5inn
b??5ite.
b??5ite??
b??5it??
b??5??6
b1??l
b4??lt
b??r4
b??rth5
b1c
bc4??
b5da
b5d??
b3dh
3beab
bea5bh6
bea6c
beal5t6
bear3b??
b1e??
b6e??r
5b4ei
beif6
beil6t
beir5f
beir5t??
beo3c
beoch4
beo5itea
beo5m
3b??it
b1f
b3gh
6bh.
b4ha
bha6d3??
bha3g4??
bh3aig
bhain3t4
bhaist3
bhal6b
bhalbh5
bhar3b
bhar3t4
bhat5a
bh??5inn
bh??5ite??
bh??r6
bh??rth5
bhc6??
b4he
4bhe.
bh5eam
3bh4ear
2bh1e??
bheif6
bheil6t
bheir5f
bheir5t??
bheo3c
bheoch4
bheo5g
bh??al5
bh??alt6
bh??5ann
bhia5ta.
bhia5tac
3bh4id
bh3im
bhin6s3e
bhin6s??
bhin6t5e
bhion5g??
bhios5
3bh4irt
6bh3i??
4bh??g
4bh3??m
bh3??n
4bh??o
bh??5ot
4bh??t
bh??6th
3bh4las
bhl??6
bhl??f5
bhlead5
1bho
bhol6ta.
bhol6t5a??
bhol6t??
bh1??
bh??i5s6
bh??5l6ac
bhran6d5
6bhre.
bh6r??a
bh6ric
bhr??3oc
bhr??o5mh4
4bhs
bh5t??
1bhu
bh4ua
bhua5da
bhua5im
bhua5ite.
bhual5
4bhuit
bh3uith
bhurd5??
bhur2l3
bhust5
bh??ir5
bh??is5
bh??m5
bia3l
bia5ta.
bia5t6ac
bia5t6aig
bia5t6a??
b1id
bid5i
bin4
bi3n??
bin5i
bins3
bint3
bion5g??
bios5
biosc6
6b1ir
6bis3
bist4
bit5s
b??3c
b1??n
b1??t
b??t5eac
b??6th5
b??6tig
blad5a
bla3gr
blas3
bl??4
bl??f3
blead5
bl6i
blim6
b1l??
b1l??
bn6i
b3n??
bod3??
bol4s
bol6ta.
bol6t5a??
bol4t??
bord3
bos5t6
b1??g
b3??id
b??5l6ac
b??6s5
b??th5
bp6??
bp6i
bpist6
b5po
brad5??
bran6d5
bran3g4
brat5??
br??6
b1r??
br??o3mh4
b1s2
b1t
bth6
bua5da
bua3im
buair3
bua5ite.
bua5itear
buin6t
bun1
bur2
burd3
burl1
bust5
3b??id
b??ir5
b??is5
b??m3
cab5al
c1ac
c1ad
ca3d??
cae4d3
caib5??
caidh5ne
cai5m4??
cain6d
cain2t3
cair6b
cairbh5
cair6d5??
cair6t5e
c2aisn
cais3t6
cait3??
c1a??
cal5an
calbh3a
cal4m
ca3m??n
can5c6
can5s6
can3t2
5caod
c6ara
3c4ar1b
carbh4
card3
c4arl
carn5??
c4ars
c6arta
cart6ac
car3??
cas1
cast6
cas5t??
cat5a
cat3??
c1??
5c6??c
c??4f3
c??6i
c2??id
c??in6t5eac
c??in6ti
c6??nn
c??r5ta.
c2??t
c3bh6
c3dh
2ce
cea6b
c3eab5a
6cead
cead5as
c3ead??
5c6eai
3ceana
5cean??
cean4t??
cear3b
cearbh4
3ceasm
ceas6t
ceast5a
cea3st??
ceast5??
cea3s??
c1e??
5ce??.
ce??6f5
ce??3n4
3c4e??na
c4ei
ceil4t
ceir5m4
ceit6s
ceo3m
ce3r4
c??al5
c??alt6
5c??as
c??a3t??
c??i6
c6??it
2c1f
c3gh
c2h
4ch.
6ch5acha
chacht6
ch1ad
chaint3
chair6d5
chais5t6
5ch6aite
ch5al.
chal4m
5champ
chan5c6
ch4ant??
char3b
charbh6
ch3arf
charn5
ch1as1
chast4
chat5a
chat5??
ch??6
ch3??ir
ch1??l
ch1??n
5ch??r
2che.
chear3b
chearbh6
cheas6t5
che??6
che??f5
cheir5m6
3ch??
ch1f
chia6
chil6
chin5t
ch??l5
ch4lasa
chlas6p5
ch4l??r
chl??6i
3ch4lo
chloch5
chlocht6
chl??d6
ch1m2
ch3n??
3c4ho
ch5oba
choirn6
cho4m
chomh3
chona5m
chon3c
chon5g
chorb5
chorn5
chor6p3
chor5t6
5ch??.
5ch??c
5ch??da
ch3??dh
ch3??g.
ch3??ig
3ch??ip
ch??1m
5ch??rai
5ch??ras
3ch??t
5ch6raic
3ch6rao
3chrap
chr??5inn
chr??5it??
3ch4re
chreach5
chreacht6
chri6
3chrio
ch6rit
ch4r??6
chr??och5
1chro
chros3
chrost6
chrua5im
4cht
1chu
chua6
chuacht6
chuil5c
chuil6t
chul5
chulc6
chur6l5
chus3
c6h??
ch??6i
ch??l5
ch3??s
cia6f5
c3iam.
cid5i
c1id??
c3igh
c1ig??
c4illi
ci3m??
cim6p5??n??
cin4d
cineach5
cineacht6
3cint
3cion
3cip
ci6p5??
ci3p4l
3cirt
cis5tear
cis5te??
cis3t6in
c3i??.
c3i??l
ci5v
2c??.
c??l5
c1??m
2c1??n
3c??r
c??t6
3c4??t.
3c4??te.
c??6th
cla4
clad5??
clad3??
clas6p5
cleach6t5
cleat5a
cl??6i
clim5
2clo
cloch5
clocht6
cl??d4
cl??3d??
cl??5im.
cl??5it??
4clu
c1m2
2cn2
cna6
cnag5
cne??5c
c2o
cod3
cof5
coil4t3
coirn4
co4m
comh3
