2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-ga.hyp.txt
bhrachta??
mbrachta??
ch??int??
gc??int??
cheilt??
gceilt??
chist??
gcist??
choirt??
gcoirt??
chreata??
gcreata??
dhoirte??
dhoirtear
dhoirt??
doirtear
ndoirte??
ndoirtear
ndoirt??
bhfuadar
fhuadar
bhfuafar
fhuafar
fuafar
ghaist??
ngaist??
ghealta??
ngealta??
ghorta??
ngorta??
haist??
l??amar
luadar
meata??
mheata??
r??alta??
r??fear
s??dar
sh??dar
s??imis
sh??imis
s??fa??
sh??fa??
spealta
dtiom-??int??
thiom-??int??
